Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2445
Share acquisition date, defined.

Share acquisition date, with respect to any person and any issuing public corporation, shall mean the date that the person first becomes an interested shareholder of the issuing public corporation.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 15.